Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 422, as last
amended by Section 1, Chapter 447, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 422), is amended to read as follows:
Section 422. A. 1. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority
shall make available on its website in an easy-to-find location an
application for a medical marijuana commercial grower license. The
application fee shall be paid by the applicant in the amounts
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3144 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov ided for in Section 427.14 of this title. A method of payment
for the application fee shall be provided on the website of the
Authority. The Authority shall have ninety (90) business days to
review the application; approve, reject, or deny the application;
and send the approval, rejection, or denial letter stating the
reasons for the rejection or denial to the applicant in the same
method the application was submitted to the Authority.
2. Beginning November 1, 2026, the total number of medical
marijuana commercial grower licenses the Authority may approve and
issue in this state shall be restricted to no more than two thousand
five hundred fifty (2,550) licenses.
B. The Subject to the restriction set forth in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of this section, the Authority shall approve all
applications which meet the following criteria:
1. The applicant must be twenty-five (25) years of age or
older;
2. The applicant, if applying as an individual, must show
residency in this state;
3. All applying entities must show that all members, managers,
and board members are Oklahoma residents;
4. An applying entity may show ownership of non-Oklahoma
residents, but that percentage ownership may not exceed twenty-five
percent (25%);

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3144 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. All applying individuals or entities must be registered to
conduct business in this state; and
6. All applicants must disclose all ownership interests in the
commercial grower operation.
Applicants with a nonviolent felony conviction in the last two
(2) years, any other felony conviction in the last five (5) years,
inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections or any
person currently incarcerated shall not qualify for a commercial
grower license.
C. A licensed medical marijuana commercial grower may sell
marijuana to a licensed medical marijuana dispensary or a licensed
medical marijuana processor. Further, sales by a licensed medical
marijuana commercial grower shall be considered wholesale sales and
shall not be subject to taxation. Under no circumstances may a
licensed medical marijuana commercial grower sell marijuana directly
to a licensed medical marijuana patient or licensed medical
marijuana caregiver. A licensed medical marijuana commercial grower
may only sell at the wholesale level to a licensed medical marijuana
dispensary, a licensed medical marijuana commercial grower or a
licensed medical marijuana processor. If the federal government
lifts restrictions on buying and selling marijuana between states,
then a licensed medical marijuana commercial grower would be allowed
to sell and buy marijuana wholesale from, or to, an out-of-state
wholesale provider. A licensed medical marijuana commercial grower
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3144 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l be required to complete a monthly yield and sales report to
the Authority. This report shall be due on the fifteenth of each
month and provide reporting on the previous month. This report
shall detail the amount of marijuana harvested in pounds, the amount
of drying or dried marijuana on hand, the amount of marijuana sold
to licensed processors in pounds, the amount of waste in pounds, and
the amount of marijuana sold to licensed medical marijuana
dispensaries in pounds. Additionally, this report shall show total
wholesale sales in dollars. The Authority shall have oversight and
auditing responsibilities to ensure that all marijuana being grown
by licensed medical marijuana commercial growers is accounted for.
D. There shall be no limits on how much marijuana a licensed
medical marijuana commercial grower can grow.
E. Beginning on November 1, 2021, licensed medical marijuana
commercial growers shall be authorized to package and sell pre-
rolled marijuana to licensed medical marijuana dispensaries. The
products described in this subsection shall contain only the ground
parts of the marijuana plant and shall not include marijuana
concentrates or derivatives. The total net weight of each pre-roll
packaged and sold by licensed medical marijuana commercial growers
shall not exceed one (1) gram. These final products must be tested,
packaged and labeled in accordance with Oklahoma law and rules
promulgated by the Authority.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3144 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. Beginning November 1, 2022, all medical marijuana commercial
grower licensees who operate an outdoor medical marijuana production
facility shall be required to register with the Oklahoma Department
of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry as an environmentally sensitive
crop owner. Registration shall provide notice to commercial and
private pesticide applicators of the locations of medical marijuana
crops and help minimize the potential for damaging pesticide drift.
Medical marijuana commercial grower licensees shall provide their
business name, address, Global Positioning System (GPS) coordinates
for all outdoor medical marijuana production facilities, and any
other information required by the Department when registering with
the Environmentally Sensitive Area Registry.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.14a, as
amended by Section 6, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 427.14a), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
April 9, 2026 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3144 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)